tests/N-dat.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../bua.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../bua.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "plain дА":
    аха<n><dat> : ахада
    һургуули<n><dat> : һургуулида
    ном<n><dat> : номдо
    нохой<n><dat> : нохойдо
    жороо<n><dat> : жороодо
    морин<n><dat> : мориндо
    һанаан<n><dat> : һанаанда
    ан<n><dat> : анда

  "vowel stem -дA": 
    үе<n><dat> : үедэ

  "optional н then дА":
    наһан<n><dat> :     [наһанда, наһада]
    хурдан<n><dat> :     [хурданда, хурдада] 
    хэмжээн<n><dat> :     [хэмжээндэ, хэмжээдэ] 
    хулгайшан<n><dat> :     [хулгайшанда, хулгайшада]

  "stem ending in -р then тA":
    газарта<n><dat> : газарта

  "plurals plus тА":
    аха<n><pl><dat> : аханарта
    һургуули<n><pl><dat> : һургуулинуудта
    ном<n><pl><dat> : номуудта
    нохой<n><pl><dat> : нохойнуудта
    морин<n><pl><dat> : моридто
    жороо<n><pl><dat> : жороонуудта
    ан<n><pl><dat> : ангуудта
